Maine, session 132, LD1996.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4323, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 575, §6, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4327, first ¶, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 575, §7, is amended to
read:
The department shall use municipal reports, data from the statewide online database
required under section 4323, subsection 6 and other metrics to generate a general assistance
report to be submitted to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction
over general assistance matters no later than January 30, 2026 and no later than January
30th of each odd-numbered calendar year thereafter. The initial report must include
recommendations regarding a potential extension of the general assistance eligibility period
beyond the 30-day limit established in section 4310, subsection 4. All reports must include
metrics for: the number of individuals and families who received funds; the basic
necessities for which those funds were provided; the length of time those funds were
received; which municipalities accessed technical assistance and the number of times that
technical assistance was requested, including instances outside of normal business hours;
the type of technical assistance municipalities required; the number of calls to the
department's general assistance hotline; and the number and content of complaints received
and additional metrics as determined necessary by the department. The report must also
include data illustrating municipal poverty levels, or regional or county poverty data when
municipal-level poverty data is unavailable, and data regarding the use of other public
benefit programs such as the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and the
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program in each municipality.